Virginia statutes. Title 28.2. Fisheries and Habitat of the Tidal Waters
Article 1. General Provisions

§ 28.2-700.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Crab dredge”
means a device, which may have teeth on the bar, that is designed and used to catch crabs buried in the bottom.

“Crab pot”
means a device made of wire or thread net used to catch crabs.

“Peeler crab”,
until the Commission promulgates a different definition, means a crab that has a soft shell fully developed under the hard shell, or a crab on which there is a pink or white line or rim on the edge of that part of the back fin next to the outer section of this fin.

“Peeler pot”
means a wire mesh pot baited with only live adult male (jimmy) blue crabs.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 28-170, 28-173; 1954, c. 368; 1956, c. 293; 1960, c. 517; 1962, c. 406, §§ 28.1-165, 28.1-169; 1964, c. 393; 1966, c. 684; 1968, c. 785; 1970, c. 726; 1979, c. 274; 1983, cc. 307, 603, § 28.1-165.1; 1985, c. 180; 1990, c. 154; 1992, c. 836; 1995, c. 129; 1996, c. 229.

Cross references.

For additional limits on use of dredges, see §

28.2-707

.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8B M.J. Fish and Fisheries, § 2.

§ 28.2-701.
Crab traps, crab pots and crab pounds; regulations; penalty.

The Commission shall promulgate regulations governing the use, placement, and maintenance of crab traps and crab pounds.

The Commission may promulgate regulations establishing the mesh size of crab pots and peeler pots. The regulation may provide for the interchangeable use of the two types of pots, provided that each respective gear is appropriately marked and cull rings in conformance with Commission requirements are installed in each pot.

Any person convicted of violating any provision of a regulation promulgated under this section is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

1990, c. 446, § 28.1-173.3; 1992, c. 836; 1999, c. 550.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.